North Carolina statutes. Chapter 111. Aid to the Blind.
Article 3. Operation of Vending Facilities on State Property.

§ 111-41.
Preference to blind persons in operation of vending facilities; responsibility of Department of Health and Human Services.

In order to promote the employment and the self-sufficiency of blind persons in North Carolina, State agencies shall upon the request of the Department of Health and Human Services give preference to blind persons in the operation of vending facilities on State property. The Department of Health and Human Services shall encourage and assist the operation of vending facilities by blind persons.

History.

1973, c. 1280, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2000-121, s. 20.

§ 111-42.
Definitions as used in this Article.

“Regular vending facility” means a vending facility where food preparation or cooking is not done on the State property.

“State agency” means department, commission, agency or instrumentality of the State.

“State property or State building” means building and land owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by the State, exclusive of schools, colleges and universities, the North Carolina State Fair, farmers markets and agricultural centers, the Legislative Office Building, and the State Legislative Building.

“Vending facility” includes a snack bar, cafeteria, restaurant, cafe, concession stand, vending stand, cart service, or other facilities at which food, drinks, novelties, newspapers, periodicals, confections, souvenirs, tobacco products or related items are regularly sold.

Repealed by Session Laws 2000-121, s. 21.

History.

1973, c. 1280, s. 1; 2000-121, s. 21; 2001-41, s. 1; 2001-424, s. 17.4.

§ 111-43.
Installation of coin-operated vending machines.

In locations where the Department of Health and Human Services determines that a vending facility may not be operated or should not continue to operate due to insufficient revenues to support a blind vendor or due to the lack of qualified blind applicants, the Department shall have the first opportunity to secure, by negotiation of a contract with one or more licensed commercial vendors, coin-operated vending machines for the location. Profits from coin-operated vending machines secured by the Department of Health and Human Services shall be used by the Department for the support of programs that enable blind and visually impaired people to live more independently, including medical, rehabilitation, independent living, and educational services offered by the Division of Services for the Blind.

History.

1973, c. 1280, s. 1; 1991, c. 689, s. 221.4(a); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 984, s. 1; 2000-121, s. 22.

§ 111-44.
Location and services provided by State agency.

If the Department of Health and Human Services determines that a location is suitable for the operation of a vending facility by a blind person, the State agency with authority over the location shall provide proper space, plumbing, lighting, and electrical outlets for the vending facility in the original planning and construction, or in the alteration and renovation of the present location. The State agency shall provide necessary utilities, janitorial service, and garbage disposal for the operation of the vending facility. Space and services for the vending facilities shall be provided without charge.

History.

1973, c. 1280, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2000-121, s. 23.

§ 111-45.
Duty of State agency to inform the Department of Health and Human Services.

It shall be the duty of the State agencies to inform the Department of Health and Human Services of existing and prospective locations for vending facilities and coin-operated vending machines and to adopt rules, upon request of the Department, to promote the successful operation of the vending facilities of the blind.

History.

1973, c. 1280, s. 1; 2000-121, s. 24.

§ 111-46.
Vending facilities operated by those other than blind persons.

Where vending facilities on State property are operated by those other than blind persons on the date of enactment of this Article, the contract of these vending facilities shall not be renewed or extended unless the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services is notified of the proposed renewal or extension and the Secretary determines within 30 days of this notification that the vending facilities are not, or cannot become, suited for operation by the blind. If the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services within 30 days of the date of this notification fails to provide for the operation of the vending facilities by the blind, the existing contract may be renewed or extended.

History.

1973, c. 1280, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2000-121, s. 25.

§ 111-47.
Exclusions.

This Article is not intended to cover food services provided by hospitals or residential institutions as a direct service to patients, inmates, trainees, or otherwise institutionalized persons, nor to cover coin-operated vending machines located in State facilities operated under the authority of G.S. 122C.

This Article shall not prohibit the continued use of coin-operated vending machines currently the property of the Division of Services for the Blind of the Department of Health and Human Services and now part of the vending-stand program.

History.

1973, c. 1280, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 984, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

§ 111-47.1.
Food service at North Carolina aquariums.

Notwithstanding this Article, the North Carolina Aquariums may operate or contract for the operation of food or vending services at the North Carolina Aquariums. Notwithstanding

G.S. 111-43

, the net proceeds of revenue generated by food and vending services that are provided at the North Carolina Aquariums and are operated by or whose operation is contracted for by the Division of North Carolina Aquariums shall be credited to the North Carolina Aquariums Fund.

This section shall not be construed to alter any contract for food or vending services at the North Carolina Aquariums that is in force on July 1, 1999.

History.

1999-237, s. 15.17(a), (b); 2014-115, s. 7(a).

§ 111-47.2.
Food service at State parks, museums and historic sites operated by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources.

Notwithstanding this Article, the North Carolina Department of Natural and Cultural Resources may operate or contract for the operation of food or vending services at State parks, museums and historic sites operated by the Department. Notwithstanding

G.S. 111-43

, the net proceeds of revenue generated by food and vending services operated by the Department or a vendor with whom the Department has contracted shall be credited to the appropriate fund of the Department where the funds were generated and shall be used for the operation of that State park, museum or historic site.

History.

2013-360, s. 19.3(a); 2014-115, s. 7(b); 2015-241, s. 14.30(s); 2016-94, s. 16.4(a).

Cross References.

As to State Historic Sites and Museums special fund, see

G.S. 121-7.7

.

Allow Museums and Historic Sites to Generate Revenue from Vendor Services and to Sell Certain Merchandise.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 19.3(b), provides: “G.S. 111-47.2, as enacted by subsection (a) of this section, shall not be construed to alter any contract for food or vending services at any museum or historic site operated by the Department that is in force at the time this section becomes law.”

§ 111-47.3.
Food service at Department of State Treasurer.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, the Department of State Treasurer may operate or contract for the operation of food or vending services at Department of State Treasurer offices. The net proceeds of revenue generated by food and vending services that are provided at the Department of State Treasurer by the agency or a vendor with whom the agency has contracted shall be credited to the Division of Services for the Blind of the Department of Health and Human Services for the purposes specified in

G.S. 111-43

.

History.

2015-164, s. 2.

§ 111-47.4.
Food service at North Carolina Zoological Park.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, the North Carolina Zoological Park may operate or contract for the operation of food or vending services at the North Carolina Zoological Park. Notwithstanding

G.S. 111-43

, the net proceeds of revenue generated by food and vending services operated by the North Carolina Zoological Park or a vendor with whom the North Carolina Zoological Park has contracted shall be credited to the North Carolina Zoo Fund.

History.

2017-57, s. 14.6(a).